Hawaii, session 2026, HB2560.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that families with children experiencing homelessness often face immediate and urgent financial needs that threaten housing stability and school attendance.  Students identified as experiencing homelessness require timely, flexible assistance to address basic necessities that directly affect their ability to remain engaged in school. The purpose of this Act is to establish a two-year pilot program allowing the use of allowable temporary assistance for needy families funds to provide short-term, flexible assistance to eligible families of students experiencing homelessness, while maintaining fiscal accountability and compliance with federal and state requirements. SECTION 2.  (a) There is established a two-year pilot program within the department of human services to provide temporary financial stabilization assistance to families with enrolled students identified as experiencing homelessness. (b)  The pilot program shall be funded through the department of human services using allowable temporary assistance for needy families funds, subject to federal and state requirements.  Funds shall be allocated by the department of human services to department of education complex area community homeless concerns liaisons. (c)  Prior to the use of funds for any family, the appropriate department of education complex area community homeless concerns liaison shall conduct a department of human services temporary assistance for needy families eligibility screening survey with the family. (d)  Assistance under the pilot program shall only be provided to families with one or more enrolled students who are: (1)  Identified as experiencing homelessness under the department of education's form MV-1; and (2)  Determined to be eligible for temporary assistance for needy families assistance based on the completed eligibility screening. (e)  Completed eligibility screening documentation shall be maintained in the student's confidential records held and managed by the appropriate department of education complex area community homeless concerns liaison. (f)  Funds distributed under the pilot program shall be used in a flexible spending model to address immediate needs necessary to stabilize the family, including but not limited to: (1)  Food; (2)  Clothing; (3)  Transportation support, including gasoline or public transportation passes; and (4)  Other short-term necessities as determined by the community homeless concerns liaison; provided that the short-term necessities are non-recurring and do not extend beyond a term of four consecutive months; provided that the flexible spending model and any expenditures are in compliance with the requirements under title 2 Code of Federal Regulations Part 200. (g)  All purchases for families and students using pilot program funds shall be made directly by the appropriate department of education complex area community homeless concerns liaison; provided that: (1)  Individual purchases shall not exceed $200 per transaction; (2)  The total assistance provided shall not exceed $500 per eligible student per school year; and (3)  Spending limits shall apply regardless of the number of transactions conducted. (h)  No direct monetary disbursements, cash assistance, or gift cards shall be provided to families or students under the pilot program; provided that if any federally-funded payments under the pilot program are made on behalf of eligible families to third-party payees, then the department of human services shall ensure that the payees that are compliant with applicable federal, state, and county laws that in any way affect the payee's ability to do business in the State, including compliance with the rules or regulations of the Internal Revenue Services or department of taxation. (i)  If a family has students enrolled in schools located in different department of education complex areas: (1)  Any respective department of education complex area community homeless concerns liaison may make allowable purchases on behalf of the family; and (2)  The community homeless concerns liaison making the purchase shall provide a copy of the purchase receipt and related documentation to all other involved liaisons for record-keeping purposes. (j)  The department of human services shall maintain records of expenditures, eligibility determinations, and assistance provided pursuant to this Act. (k)  The department of education shall provide periodic reports to the department of human services detailing: (1)  The number of students and families served; (2)  The types of assistance provided; (3)  Total expenditures; and (4)  Any additional information required to ensure temporary assistance for needy families compliance. (l)  The department of human services and department of education shall enter into information sharing agreements to reduce duplication of services already provided by the department of human services. (m)  The pilot program shall cease to exist on June 30, 2028, unless extended by the legislature. SECTION 3.  The department of human services, in consultation with the department of education, may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as necessary to implement this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.